Utah statutes.
54-4-15.3.   Signals or devices at grade crossings -- Apportionment of costs.

The Department of Transportation, in accordance with the provisions of Section 54-4-15, shall apportion the cost of the installation, maintenance, reconstruction or improvement of any signals or devices described in Section 54-4-15.1 between the railroad or street railroad and the public agency involved. Unless otherwise ordered by the department, the liability of cities, towns and counties to pay the share of maintenance cost assigned to the local agencies by the department shall be limited to the funds provided under this act. Payment of any money from the funds provided shall be made on the basis of verified claims filed with the Department of Transportation by the railroad or street railroad corporation responsible for the physical installation, maintenance, reconstruction or improvement of the signal or device.



Amended by Chapter 9, 1975 Special Session 1

